New York, session 2025-2026, A6645.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 254 of the elder law as amended by section 19 of 2 part T of chapter 56 of the laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 254. Cost of living adjustment. 1. [Within amounts appropriated, 4 the] The commissioner of health shall annually adjust the program eligi- 5 bility standards set forth in subdivision two of section two hundred 6 forty-two of this title to account for increases in the cost of living. 7 Such increase shall not exceed the consumer price index (all items 8 United States city average) for the previous year. 9 2. The commissioner shall further adjust individual and joint income 10 categories set forth in subdivisions two and four of section two hundred 11 forty-eight of this title to conform to the adjustments made pursuant to 12 subdivision one of this section. 13 3. The commissioner shall annually adjust the program eligibility 14 standards set forth in subdivision one of section two hundred forty-two 15 of this title to account for increases in the cost of living. Such 16 increase shall not exceed the consumer price index (all items United 17 States city average) for the previous year. 18 4. The commissioner shall further adjust individual and joint income 19 categories set forth in subdivisions two and four of section two hundred 20 forty-seven of this title to conform to the adjustments made pursuant to 21 subdivision three of this section. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10245-01-5